Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 2

City Manager

6-35-201. Appointment and qualifications.

The council shall appoint a chief administrative officer of the city who shall be the city manager, and who shall serve at the pleasure of the council.

The manager shall be selected on the basis of training, experience, and other administrative qualifications for the office and without regard to such person's political or religious preference or such person's place of residence at the time of appointment.

No council member shall be eligible for the position of manager within two (2) years after the expiration of the member's latest councilmanic term.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.01; T.C.A., § 6-3501.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

6-35-202. Temporary absence or disability.

The council may designate a qualified administrative officer of the city to assume the duties and authority of the manager during periods of vacancy in the office, temporary absences or disability of the manager.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.02; T.C.A., § 6-3502.

6-35-203. Council-manager relationships.

The manager shall be responsible to the council for the administration of all units of the city government under the manager's jurisdiction and for carrying out policies adopted by the council.

Except for the purpose of inquiry, the council and its members shall deal with the administrative officers and employees solely through the manager.

Neither the council nor any member thereof shall give orders to the manager's subordinates or otherwise interfere with managerial functions through such means as directing or requesting the appointment or removal of any of the manager's subordinates, or the making of particular purchases from, or contracts with, any specific organization.

The office of any council member violating any provision of this section shall immediately become vacant upon such person's conviction in a court of competent jurisdiction.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.03; T.C.A., § 6-3503.

6-35-204. Powers and duties.

The manager shall:

Supervise the administrative affairs of the city;

Be charged with the preservation of the public peace and health, the safety of persons and properties, and the enforcement of the laws, ordinances, and franchises, and the development and utilization of the city's resources;

Make such reports and recommendations as the manager may deem desirable and perform such other duties as may be prescribed by this charter or required of the manager by ordinance or resolution of the council not inconsistent with this charter; and

Have the right to take part in the discussion of all matters coming before the council, but not the right to vote.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.04; T.C.A., § 6-3504.

6-35-205. Purchasing.

Except as provided in § 6-36-115, the manager shall be responsible for all city purchasing but may delegate such duty to any subordinate appointed by the manager.

Competitive prices for all purchases and public improvements shall be obtained whenever practicable and in accordance with regulations established by ordinance, and the purchase made from or the contract awarded to the lowest responsible bidder; provided, that the city shall have the power to reject any and all bids.

Formal sealed bids shall be obtained in all transactions involving the expenditure of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, and the transaction shall be evidenced by written contract submitted to and approved by the council; provided, that in cases where the council indicates by formal unanimous resolution of those present at the meeting, based upon the written recommendation of the manager, that it is clearly to the advantage of the city not to contract with competitive bidding, it may authorize noncompetitive contracts.

The council may also authorize the making of public improvements or the performing of any other city work by any city department or agency without competitive bidding.

Purchasing and contract procedures not prescribed by this charter or other law may be established by ordinance.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.19; T.C.A., § 6-3518; Acts 1993, ch. 353, § 3; 2002, ch. 543, § 1.

Collateral References.

Liability of municipality on quasi contract for value of property or work furnished without compliance with bidding requirements. 33 A.L.R.3d 1164.

Right of municipal corporation to recover back from contractor payments made under contract violating competitive bidding statute. 33 A.L.R.3d 397.

6-35-206. Management of city property and equipment — Lease of property and equipment to contractors for city services.

The management of all city property and equipment, except school property and equipment, shall be the responsibility of the city manager who shall prepare for the approval of the council regulations governing the acquisition, custody, use and disposal of all such property and equipment. Such regulations shall provide for a regular inventory, appraisal and marking of all such property and shall require that the disposal of any city property and equipment shall be by sale, with sealed bids taken or public auction held on such property and equipment valued at more than five hundred dollars ($500); provided, that any sale for more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or any sale of real estate shall be subject to the approval of the city council.

The mayor and city council may by ordinance authorize the city to enter into contracts for city services and may lease machinery, equipment, and real property belonging to the city to such contractors to provide for city services. The contracts shall contain such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by the city and the contractor; provided, that any contract shall be performed within the term of the mayor and city council authorizing it. The contractor shall be paid for the service from reasonably anticipated taxes or other revenue. Notwithstanding § 6-35-205, no contract for a city service or the leasing of machinery, equipment, or real property by the contractor shall be subject to competitive bids.

Subdivision (b)(1) applies only to cities with populations greater than eleven thousand eight hundred twenty-five (11,825) but less than twelve thousand twenty-five (12,025), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and that are located in counties with populations greater than twenty-nine thousand nine hundred (29,900) but less than thirty thousand (30,000), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Subdivision (b)(1) is applicable only to garbage collection and fire protection services.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.20; T.C.A., § 6-3519; Acts 1981, ch. 496, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.